Washington statutes.
RCW 7.105.310

Relief for temporary and full protection orders—Other than for extreme risk protection orders.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5202-S.SL) ***

(1) In issuing any type of protection order, other than an ex parte temporary antiharassment protection order as limited by subsection (2) of this section, and other than an extreme risk protection order, the court shall have broad discretion to grant such relief as the court deems proper, including an order that provides relief as follows:

(a) Restrain the respondent from committing any of the following acts against the petitioner and other persons protected by the order: Domestic violence; nonconsensual sexual conduct or nonconsensual sexual penetration; sexual abuse; stalking; acts of abandonment, abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation against a vulnerable adult; and unlawful harassment;

(b) Restrain the respondent from making any attempts to have contact, including nonphysical contact, with the petitioner or the petitioner's family or household members who are minors or other members of the petitioner's household, either directly, indirectly, or through third parties regardless of whether those third parties know of the order;

(c) Exclude the respondent from the residence that the parties share;

(d) Exclude the respondent from the residence, workplace, or school of the petitioner; or from the day care or school of a minor child;

(e) Restrain the respondent from knowingly coming within, or knowingly remaining within, a specified distance from a specified location including, but not limited to, a residence, school, day care, workplace, the protected party's person, and the protected party's vehicle. The specified distance shall presumptively be at least 1,000 feet, unless the court for good cause finds that a shorter specified distance is appropriate;

(f) If the parties have children in common, make residential provisions with regard to their minor children on the same basis as is provided in chapter 26.09 RCW. However, parenting plans as specified in chapter 26.09 RCW must not be required under this chapter. The court may not delay or defer relief under this chapter on the grounds that the parties could seek a parenting plan or modification to a parenting plan in a different action. A protection order must not be denied on the grounds that the parties have an existing parenting plan in effect. A protection order may suspend the respondent's contact with the parties' children under an existing parenting plan, subject to further orders in a family law proceeding;

(g) Order the respondent to participate in a state-certified domestic violence perpetrator treatment program approved under RCW 43.20A.735 or a state-certified sex offender treatment program approved under RCW 18.155.070;

(h) Order the respondent to obtain a mental health or chemical dependency evaluation. If the court determines that a mental health evaluation is necessary, the court shall clearly document the reason for this determination and provide a specific question or questions to be answered by the mental health professional. The court shall consider the ability of the respondent to pay for an evaluation. Minors are presumed to be unable to pay. The parent or legal guardian is responsible for costs unless the parent or legal guardian demonstrates inability to pay;

(i) In cases where the petitioner and the respondent are students who attend the same public or private elementary, middle, or high school, the court, when issuing a protection order and providing relief, shall consider, among the other facts of the case, the severity of the act, any continuing physical danger, emotional distress, or educational disruption to the petitioner, and the financial difficulty and educational disruption that would be caused by a transfer of the respondent to another school. The court may order that the respondent not attend the public or private elementary, middle, or high school attended by the petitioner. If a minor respondent is prohibited attendance at the minor's assigned public school, the school district must provide the student comparable educational services in another setting. In such a case, the district shall provide transportation at no cost to the respondent if the respondent's parent or legal guardian is unable to pay for transportation. The district shall put in place any needed supports to ensure successful transition to the new school environment. The court shall send notice of the restriction on attending the same school as the petitioner to the public or private school the respondent will attend and to the school the petitioner attends;

(j) Require the respondent to pay the administrative court costs and service fees, as established by the county or municipality incurring the expense, and to reimburse the petitioner for costs incurred in bringing the action, including reasonable attorneys' fees or limited license legal technician fees when such fees are incurred by a person licensed and practicing in accordance with state supreme court admission and practice rule 28, the limited practice rule for limited license legal technicians. Minors are presumed to be unable to pay. The parent or legal guardian is responsible for costs unless the parent or legal guardian demonstrates inability to pay;

(k) Restrain the respondent from harassing, following, monitoring, keeping under physical or electronic surveillance, cyber harassment as defined in RCW 9A.90.120, and using telephonic, audiovisual, or other electronic means to monitor the actions, location, or communication of the petitioner or the petitioner's family or household members who are minors or other members of the petitioner's household. For the purposes of this subsection, "communication" includes both "wire communication" and "electronic communication" as defined in RCW 9.73.260;

(l) Other than for respondents who are minors, require the respondent to submit to electronic monitoring. The order must specify who shall provide the electronic monitoring services and the terms under which the monitoring must be performed. The order also may include a requirement that the respondent pay the costs of the monitoring. The court shall consider the ability of the respondent to pay for electronic monitoring;

(m) Consider the provisions of RCW 9.41.800, and order the respondent to surrender, and prohibit the respondent from accessing, having in his or her custody or control, possessing, purchasing, attempting to purchase or receive, or receiving, all firearms, dangerous weapons, and any concealed pistol license, as required in RCW 9.41.800;

(n) Order possession and use of essential personal effects. The court shall list the essential personal effects with sufficient specificity to make it clear which property is included. Personal effects may include pets. The court may order that a petitioner be granted the exclusive custody or control of any pet owned, possessed, leased, kept, or held by the petitioner, respondent, or minor child residing with either the petitioner or respondent, and may prohibit the respondent from interfering with the petitioner's efforts to obtain the pet. The court may also prohibit the respondent from knowingly coming within, or knowingly remaining within, a specified distance of specified locations where the pet is regularly found;

(o) Order use of a vehicle;

(p) Enter an order restricting the respondent from engaging in abusive litigation as set forth in chapter 26.51 RCW or in frivolous filings against the petitioner, making harassing or libelous communications about the petitioner to third parties, or making false reports to investigative agencies. A petitioner may request this relief in the petition or by separate motion. A petitioner may request this relief by separate motion at any time within five years of the date the protection order is entered even if the order has since expired. A stand-alone motion for an order restricting abusive litigation may be brought by a party who meets the requirements of chapter 26.51 RCW regardless of whether the party has previously sought a protection order under this chapter, provided the motion is made within five years of the date the order that made a finding of domestic violence was entered. In cases where a finding of domestic violence was entered pursuant to an order under chapter 26.09, *26.26, or 26.26A RCW, a motion for an order restricting abusive litigation may be brought under the family law case or as a stand-alone action filed under this chapter, when it is not reasonable or practical to file under the family law case;

(q) Restrain the respondent from committing acts of abandonment, abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation against a vulnerable adult;

(r) Require an accounting by the respondent of the disposition of the vulnerable adult's income or other resources;

(s) Restrain the transfer of either the respondent's or vulnerable adult's property, or both, for a specified period not exceeding 90 days;

(t) Order financial relief and restrain the transfer of jointly owned assets;

(u) Restrain the respondent from possessing or distributing intimate images, as defined in RCW 9A.86.010, depicting the petitioner including, but not limited to, requiring the respondent to: Take down and delete all intimate images and recordings of the petitioner in the respondent's possession or control; and cease any and all disclosure of those intimate images. The court may also inform the respondent that it would be appropriate to ask third parties in possession or control of the intimate images of this protection order to take down and delete the intimate images so that the order may not inadvertently be violated; or

(v) Order other relief as it deems necessary for the protection of the petitioner and other family or household members who are minors or vulnerable adults for whom the petitioner has sought protection, including orders or directives to a law enforcement officer, as allowed under this chapter.

(2) In an antiharassment protection order proceeding, the court may grant the relief specified in subsection (1)(c), (f), and (t) of this section only as part of a full antiharassment protection order.

(3) The court in granting a temporary antiharassment protection order or a civil antiharassment protection order shall not prohibit the respondent from exercising constitutionally protected free speech. Nothing in this section prohibits the petitioner from utilizing other civil or criminal remedies to restrain conduct or communications not otherwise constitutionally protected.

(4) The court shall not take any of the following actions in issuing a protection order.

(a) The court may not order the petitioner to obtain services including, but not limited to, drug testing, victim support services, a mental health assessment, or a psychological evaluation.

(b) The court shall not issue a full protection order to any party except upon notice to the respondent and the opportunity for a hearing pursuant to a petition or counter-petition filed and served by the party seeking relief in accordance with this chapter. Except as provided in RCW 7.105.210, the court shall not issue a temporary protection order to any party unless the party has filed a petition or counter-petition for a protection order seeking relief in accordance with this chapter.

(c) Under no circumstances shall the court deny the petitioner the type of protection order sought in the petition on the grounds that the court finds that a different type of protection order would have a less severe impact on the respondent.

(5) The order shall specify the date the order expires, if any. For permanent orders, the court shall set the date to expire 99 years from the issuance date. The order shall also state whether the court issued the protection order following personal service, service by electronic means, service by mail, or service by publication, and whether the court has approved service by mail or publication of an order issued under this section.

[2022 c 268 s 17; 2022 c 231 s 9; 2021 c 215 s 39.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note:*(1) The majority of chapter 26.26 RCW was repealed by 2018 c 6 s 907. For later enactment of the uniform parentage act, see chapter 26.26A RCW.

(2) This section was amended by 2022 c 231 s 9 and by 2022 c 268 s 17, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Effective dates—2022 c 268: See note following RCW 7.105.010.

Effective date—2022 c 231 ss 8, 9, 11, 13, and 15: See note following RCW 7.105.010.

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.